Illinois, session 104th, HB1886.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 5i as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5i)7    Sec. 5i. Transfer reports Transfers. 8    (a) Each year, the Governor's Office of Management and 9Budget shall, at the time set forth for the submission of the 10State budget under Section 50-5 of the State Budget Law, 11provide to the Chairperson and the Minority Spokesperson of 12each of the appropriations committees of the House of 13Representatives and the Senate a report of (i) all full fiscal 14year transfers from State general funds to any other special 15fund of the State in the previous fiscal year and during the 16current fiscal year to date, and (ii) all projected full 17fiscal year transfers from State general funds to those funds 18for the remainder of the current fiscal year and the next 19fiscal year, based on estimates prepared by the Governor's 20Office of Management and Budget. The report shall include a 21detailed summary of the estimates upon which the projected 22transfers are based. The report shall also indicate, for each 23transfer:  HB1886- 2 -LRB104 08946 HLH 19001 b1        (1) whether or not there is statutory authority for 2    the transfer; 3        (2) if there is statutory authority for the transfer, 4    whether that statutory authority exists for the next 5    fiscal year; and 6        (3) whether there is debt service associated with the 7    transfer. 8    (b) Beginning in 2026, the Governor's Office of Management 9and Budget shall, at the time set forth for the submission of 10the State budget under Section 50-5 of the State Budget Law, 11provide to the Chairperson and the Minority Spokesperson of 12each of the appropriations committees of the House of 13Representatives and the Senate, as well as to the Commission 14on Government Forecasting and Accountability, a report of (i) 15all full fiscal year transfers made among line-item 16appropriations under Section 13.2 in the previous fiscal year 17and during the current fiscal year to date, and (ii) all 18projected full fiscal year transfers to be made among 19line-item appropriations under Section 13.2 for the remainder 20of the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year, based on 21estimates prepared by the Governor's Office of Management and 22Budget. The report shall include a detailed summary of 23estimates upon which projected line-item transfers are based. 24    (c) The General Assembly shall consider the reports 25described in this Section report in the appropriations 26process.   HB1886- 3 -LRB104 08946 HLH 19001 b1(Source: P.A. 98-24, eff. 6-19-13; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.